Maryland, session 2026, HB0643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
2–302.
(a) To qualify for a license, an applicant shall be an individual who meets the
requirements of this section.
(b) The applicant shall be of good character and reputation.
(c) The applicant shall be at least 18 years old.
(d) The applicant shall meet the educational requirements under § 2–303 of this
subtitle.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, the applicant shall pass an
examination given by the Board under this subtitle.
(f) The applicant for an initial license shall complete practical work experience
that is approved by the Board and that:
(1) is obtained over a period of:
(i) not more than [3] 6 years; and
– 1 –

Ch. 174 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) [1. not less than 6 months if the applicant applies before
October 1, 2000; or
2.] not less than 1 year [if the applicant applies on or after
October 1, 2000];
(2) includes providing any type of service or advice involving the use of
accounting, attest, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills;
(3) is performed under the direction of:
(i) a licensed certified public accountant; or
(ii) an appropriately qualified professional as determined by the
Board;
(4) is obtained through employment in government, industry, academia, or
public practice; and
(5) amounts to:
(i) [1,000 hours if the applicant applies before October 1, 2000; or
(ii)] 2,000 hours if the applicant [applies on or after October 1, 2000.]
SEEKS TO QUALIFY FOR A LICENSE UNDER § 2–303(A)(2)(I) OR (II) OF THIS
SUBTITLE; OR
(II) 4,000 HOURS IF THE APPLICANT SEEKS TO QUALIFY FOR A
LICENSE UNDER § 2–303(A)(2)(III) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
2–303.
(a) (1) In order to take the examination, an applicant shall [have satisfactorily
completed 120 semester hours or their equivalent, and] hold a baccalaureate or higher
degree that meets the requirements of this section.
(2) In order to become licensed, in addition to the other qualifications for a
license set forth in this subtitle, an applicant shall have satisfactorily completed [150
semester hours or their equivalent, including the attainment of a baccalaureate or higher
degree that meets the requirements of this section]:
(I) 1. A MASTER’S DEGREE WITH A CONCENTRATION IN
ACCOUNTING OR AN EQUIVALENT OF A CONCENTRATION IN ACCOUNTING; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 174
2. NOT LESS THAN 1 YEAR OF PRACTICAL WORK
EXPERIENCE AS DESCRIBED IN § 2–302(F)(5)(I) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) 1. A BACCALAUREATE DEGREE AND AN ADDITIONAL 30
SEMESTER CREDIT HOURS WITH A CONCENTRATION IN ACCOUNTING OR AN
EQUIVALENT OF A CONCENTRATION IN ACCOUNTING; AND
2. NOT LESS THAN 1 YEAR OF PRACTICAL WORK
EXPERIENCE AS DESCRIBED IN § 2–302(F)(5)(I) OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(III) 1. A BACCALAUREATE DEGREE WITH A CONCENTRATION
IN ACCOUNTING OR AN EQUIVALENT OF A CONCENTRATION IN ACCOUNTING; AND
2. NOT LESS THAN 2 YEARS OF PRACTICAL WORK
EXPERIENCE AS DESCRIBED IN § 2–302(F)(5)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) The applicant shall have completed for the BACCALAUREATE OR MASTER’S
degree REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, a curriculum that the
Board considers to constitute:
(1) a major in accounting; or
(2) a substantial equivalent to a major in accounting, of which required
credits or courses may be taken at any 2– or 4–year regionally accredited institution of
higher education.
(c) The degree required under this section shall be awarded by a school, college,
university, or other institution that:
(1) is a member of the Association to Advance Collegiate Schools of
Business;
(2) is a member of the Accreditation Council for Business Schools and
Programs;
(3) is accredited by or is a constituent unit of an institution accredited by:
(i) the Middle States Association of Colleges and Schools; or
(ii) the equivalent regional accrediting association for other regional
areas; or
(4) is recognized and approved by the Board.
– 3 –

Ch. 174 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) (1) The Board may use the services of any institution that it considers
appropriate to determine what constitutes a substantial equivalent to a major in accounting
under subsection (b)(2) of this section.
(2) If the Board uses an institution to determine curriculum equivalencies,
the Board may accept as final the determination of that institution.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 4 –